District of Columbia statutes.
7-651.07

Decision to resuscitate.

(a)

If EMS personnel encounter a patient who is in cardiac or respiratory arrest and the patient is wearing a comfort care bracelet or necklace that is intact or has not been defaced, but the patient, or the patient’s authorized decision-maker or surrogate, orally requests that EMS personnel resuscitate the patient, EMS personnel shall resuscitate and the patient, or the patient’s authorized decision-maker or surrogate, shall remove the comfort care bracelet or necklace from the patient to ensure that the revocation of the comfort care order is honored at the hospital.

(b)

If EMS personnel encounter a patient who is in cardiac or respiratory arrest and the patient is wearing a comfort care bracelet or necklace that is not intact or has been defaced, EMS personnel shall resuscitate. If there is a reason to question whether the comfort care bracelet or necklace is intact or has been defaced, EMS personnel shall resuscitate.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-224, § 8, 48 DCR 27